phon_rules.xfscript
# Michif phonological rules
# Author: Fineen Davis <Fineen.Davis@nrc-cnrc.gc.ca>
# Contributors:
#  - Eddie Antonio Santos <Eddie.Santos@nrc-cnrc.gc.ca>
#
# Phonological rules based on the following sources:
# Rosen, N. (2007). Domains in michif phonology (Order No. NR27995).
# Bakker, P. (1991). The Ojibwa Element in Mitchif. Algonquian Papers-Archive, 22.

################################# Constants ##################################

define Vowel    a | e | i | o | u ;

############################## Epenthesis rules ##############################

# Rosen, N. (2007). Domains in michif phonology (Order No. NR27995).
# 't' is epenthesized between the 'ni'/'ki' morphemes and a vowel
# Example 
# ki-aja-n -> kitajan
# Example 
# ni-aja-n -> nitajan (see NiDeletion for final surface form)

define TInsertion [..] -> t || n i | k i "<" _ Vowel ;

############################### Elision rules ################################

# Bakker, P. (1991). The Ojibwa Element in Mitchif. Algonquian Papers-Archive, 22.
# Voiceless consonants are voiced when preceeded by the 'ni' morpheme and followed by a vowel. The ni morpheme is then deleted.
#Example
# ni-kii-waapam-aa-w -> giiwaapamaaw

define NiKDeletion n i "<" k -> g || _ Vowel ;
define NiTDeletion n i "<" t -> d || _ Vowel ;
define NiPDeletion n i "<" p -> b || _ Vowel ;
define NiSDeletion n i "<" s -> z || _ Vowel ;

# Bakker, P. (1991). The Ojibwa Element in Mitchif. Algonquian Papers-Archive, 22.
# The 'ki' morpheme is deleted when followed by a 'k'
# Example
# ki-kiiw-aa-n -> kiiwaan

define KiDeletion k i -> 0 || _ "<" k ;

# Bakker, P. (1991). The Ojibwa Element in Mitchif. Algonquian Papers-Archive, 22.
# Word-final 'w' is deleted
# Example
# ee-wapam-a-ihkw -> eewapamajihk

define WDeletion    w -> 0 || _ ">" ;

################################ Vowel merges ################################

# Vowel merging rules are based on Michif language data in:
# Souter, H. (2010). An Index of Verb Finals in Michif. An Inventory of Abstract and Complex Verb Finals
# Using the Michif Dictionary: Turtle Mountain Chippewa Cree as Corpus.

# Vowel merges occur when the joining of two morphemes results in a sequence of two or more adjacent vowels
# Example kii-miyo-eeht-am -> kiimiyeehtam
# Example kii-piiwee-eeyim-ee-w -> kiipiiweeyimeew

define eeiVowelMerge    i -> 0 || e e ">" | e e "<" _ ;
define eeeeVowelMerge e e -> 0 || e e _ ;
define eeeVowelMerge    e -> 0 || e e _ ;
define oiMerge          i -> 0 || o ">" | o "<" _ ;
define oeeMerge         o -> 0 || _ ">" e e | "<" e e ;
define oaaMerge         o -> 0 || _ ">" a a | ">" a a ;
define aoMerge          o -> 0 || a "<" | a ">" _ ;
define iiiVowelMerge    i -> 0 || i i _ ;
